Illinois, session 104th, HB1552.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the School 5District Impact Note Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Impact on education in the State" means the total sum 8that the State Board estimates school districts in the State 9will expend to implement a bill and the total number of 10additional hours that the State Board estimates teachers and 11school administrators in the State will expend implementing 12the requirements of a bill.13    "State Board" means the Illinois State Board of Education. 14    Section 10. Applicability. Every bill that could have a 15negative impact on the finances of a school district in the 16State or that could cause a school district to expend 17additional staffing resources shall have prepared for it by 18the State Board, before second reading in the house of 19introduction, a brief explanatory statement or note describing 20the bill's anticipated impact on education in the State. 21    Section 15. Preparation of the School District Impact   HB1552- 2 -LRB104 03439 LNS 13462 b1Note.2    (a) Upon request of the sponsor of a bill described in 3Section 10, the State Board shall prepare a written note 4setting forth the information required by Section 10. The note 5shall be designated as a School District Impact Note and shall 6be furnished to the sponsor within 10 calendar days after the 7request. If, because of the complexity of the bill, additional 8time is required for preparation of the School District Impact 9Note, the State Board may so notify the sponsor and request an 10extension of time not to exceed 5 additional days within which 11to furnish the School District Impact Note. An extension may 12not, however, be beyond May 15 following the date of the 13request.14    (b) Whenever the sponsor of any bill is of the opinion that 15no School District Impact Note is necessary, any member of 16either house may thereafter request that a School District 17Impact Note be obtained, and in such case, the matter shall be 18decided by majority vote of those present and voting in the 19house of which he or she is a member. If the sponsor believes 20that a School District Impact Note request has been filed in 21bad faith, the sponsor may ask for a vote to render one or more 22School District Impact Note requests inapplicable.23    (c) Whenever a bill is amended on the floor of either house 24in a manner as to bring it within the description of bills set 25forth in Section 10, a majority of that house may propose that 26no action be taken upon the amendment until the sponsor of the   HB1552- 3 -LRB104 03439 LNS 13462 b1amendment presents a School District Impact Note to the 2members. 3    Section 20. Content of the School District Impact Note.4    (a) The School District Impact Note shall be factual, 5brief, and concise and shall provide as reliable of a 6statement of the bill's anticipated impact on education in the 7State as is possible under the circumstances. The School 8District Impact Note shall include both the immediate 9financial impact and, if determinable or reasonably 10foreseeable, the long-range financial impact of the bill, as 11well as short-term and long-term estimates of additional 12staffing needs. The School District Impact Note must also 13state whether the bill will have a disparate impact on the 14finances or staffing needs of school districts in the State.15    (b) No comment or opinion shall be included in the School 16District Impact Note with regard to the merits of the bill for 17which the School District Impact Note is prepared; however, 18technical or mechanical defects in the bill may be noted. The 19School District Impact Note shall be signed by the State 20Superintendent of Education or his or her designee. 21    Section 25. Participation in hearing. The fact that a 22School District Impact Note is prepared for any bill shall not 23preclude or restrict the appearance before any committee of 24the General Assembly of any State official or employee who   HB1552- 4 -LRB104 03439 LNS 13462 b1desires to be heard in support of or in opposition to the bill.  2    Section 30. Confidentiality. The subject matter of bills 3submitted to the State Board shall be kept in strict 4confidence by the State Board, and no information relating to 5the bill or its anticipated impact on education in the State 6shall be divulged, before the bill's introduction in the 7General Assembly, by any State official or employee of the 8State Board, except to the bill's sponsor or his or her 9designee. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.